Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.050

Board's authority.

The board has the following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for applicants for licensure as provided by this chapter;

(3) To approve the method of administration for examinations required by this chapter or by rule. To adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other organizations. To set the time and place of examinations with the approval of the director;

(4) To adopt standards of professional conduct and practice. Rules of professional conduct will be consistent with those outlined for engineers and land surveyors; and

(5) To designate specialties of geology to be licensed under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 256 s 7; 2002 c 86 s 262; 2000 c 253 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.